Washington statutes.
RCW 13.06.030

Rules—Standards—"Consolidated juvenile services" defined.

The department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules prescribing minimum standards for the operation of consolidated juvenile services programs for juvenile offenders and such other rules as may be necessary for the administration of the provisions of this chapter. Consolidated juvenile services is a mechanism through which the department of children, youth, and families supports local county comprehensive program plans in providing services to offender groups. Standards shall be sufficiently flexible to support current programs which have demonstrated effectiveness and efficiency, to foster development of innovative and improved services for juvenile offenders, to permit direct contracting with private vendors, and to encourage community support for and assistance to local programs. The secretary of children, youth, and families shall seek advice from appropriate juvenile justice system participants in developing standards and procedures for the operation of consolidated juvenile services programs and the distribution of funds under this chapter.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 717; 1983 c 191 s 3; 1979 c 141 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 165 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.